Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-307
Ambulance, defined.

Ambulance means any privately or publicly owned motor vehicle that is especially designed, constructed or modified, and equipped and is intended to be used and is maintained or operated for the overland transportation of patients upon the highways in this state or any other motor vehicle used for such purposes but does not include or mean any motor vehicle owned or operated under the direct control of an agency of the United States Government.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 7.